Hawaii, session 2025, SB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 196-71, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The Hawaii state energy office shall: (1)  Provide analysis and planning to actively develop and inform policies to achieve energy efficiency, renewable energy, energy resiliency, and clean transportation goals with the legislature, public utilities commission, state agencies, and other relevant stakeholders; (2)  Lead efforts to incorporate energy efficiency, renewable energy, energy resiliency, and clean transportation to reduce costs and achieve clean energy goals across all public facilities; (3)  Provide renewable energy, energy efficiency, energy resiliency, and clean transportation project deployment facilitation to assist private sector project completion when aligned with state energy goals; [and] (4)  Engage the private sector to help lead efforts to achieve renewable energy and clean transportation goals through the Hawaii clean energy initiative[.]; and (5)  Be authorized to adopt, through rule, any federal regulation as it existed on January 1, 2025, pertaining to energy efficiency, renewable energy, or clean transportation, that the Hawaii state energy office deems to be in the public interest." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________